District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Pets in Housing Amendment Act of 2025".
TITLE I. HOME INSURANCE RESTRICTIONS AFFECTING PETS.
Sec. 101. Pet insurance.
(a) An insurer providing a policy for a homeowner shall not inquire as to the specific
breed or mixture of breeds of dog that is present, maintained, or kept at the property or refuse to
issue, cancel, refuse to renew, or increase a premium or rate for a homeowner's insurance policy
based on the breed or mixture of breeds of dog that is present, maintained, or kept at the
property.
(b) This section shall not prohibit an insurer from inquiring as to and refusing to issue,
cancelling, refusing to renew, or imposing a reasonable increase to a premium or rate for a


homeowner's insurance policy based upon sound underwriting and actuarial principles, including
but not limited to the as to whether the behavioral history of an individual dog includes prior
aggressive acts or the individual dog is known to be dangerous or has been declared to be
dangerous in accordance chapter 19 of the code of the District of Columbia.”.
TITLE II. RECOGNIZING HOUSING REGULATIONS AS FUNDED.
Sec. 201. Section 4(a) of the Pets in Housing Amendment Act of 2024, effective March
21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-308; D.C. Official Code passim), is amended by striking the phrase “This
act shall apply” and insert the phrase “Section 3 of this act shall apply” in its place.
TITLE III. FISCAL IMPACT; EFFECTIVE DATE.
Sec. 301. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section, 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(3)).
Sec. 302. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).